Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2374YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 233 Section 1. Section 321.311, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The driver of a vehicle intending to turn at an 3 intersection shall do so as follows all of the following, as 4 applicable : 5 a. Both the approach for a right turn and right turn shall 6 be made as close as practical practicable to the right-hand 7 curb or edge of the roadway. 8 b. Approach for a left turn shall be made in that portion of 9 the right half of the roadway nearest the center line thereof 10 and , after entering the intersection , the left turn shall be 11 made so as to depart from the intersection to the right of the 12 center line and as close as practicable to the center line of 13 the roadway being entered. 14 c. Approach for a left turn from a two-way street into 15 a one-way street shall be made in that portion of the right 16 half of the roadway nearest the center line thereof and by 17 passing to the right of such center line where it enters the 18 intersection and, after entering the intersection, the left 19 turn shall be made so as to depart from the intersection as 20 close as practicable to the left-hand curb or edge of the 21 street being entered . A 22 d. Approach for a left turn from a one-way street into a 23 two-way street shall be made by passing as close as practicable 24 to the left-hand curb or edge of the street and, after entering 25 the intersection, the left turn shall be made so as to depart 26 from the intersection to the right of the center line and as 27 close as practicable to the center line of the street being 28 entered upon leaving the intersection . 29 Sec. 2. Section 321.311, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 30 following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. The driver of a vehicle making a turn 32 at an intersection from a laned highway into another laned 33 highway shall maintain and complete the turn by approaching, 34 entering, and departing the intersection in the same 35 -1- LSB 2374YH (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 233 corresponding lane, as determined from the right-hand edge of 1 the roadway for a vehicle turning right, and from the left-hand 2 edge of the roadway for a vehicle turning left. 3